Washington statutes.
RCW 24.36.470

Enforcement by association to secure delivery by member.

A contract entered into by a member of an association, providing for the delivery to such association of products produced or acquired by the member, may be specifically enforced by the association to secure the delivery to it of such fishery products, any provisions of law to the contrary notwithstanding.

[ 1959 c 312 s 47.]